Tennessee, session 114, HB1852.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee mRNA
Pharmaceutical Sovereignty and Safety Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 63, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Healthcare provider" means an individual who is licensed, registered,
certified, or otherwise permitted under this title or title 68 to engage in the
provision of health care or veterinary medicine in the course of a profession; and
(2) "mRNA vaccine or vaccine material":
(A) Means a substance to stimulate the production of antibodies
and provide immunity against disease by introducing messenger
ribonucleic acid (mRNA) that corresponds to a viral protein; and
(B) Includes a self-amplifying mRNA (samRNA) vaccine or
vaccine material.
(b) An individual, including a healthcare provider, shall not administer to any
human or animal in this state a vaccine or other injectable solution that contains an
mRNA vaccine or vaccine material.
(c)
- 5 - 010844

(1) A violation of subsection (b) is a Class A misdemeanor, punishable
only by a fine of up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation.
The administration of each vaccine or other injectable solution in violation of
subsection (b) constitutes a separate violation.
(2) In addition to subdivision (c)(1), a healthcare provider who violates
subsection (b) may be subject to administrative sanction or penalty by the
healthcare provider's regulatory entity, up to and including revocation of the
healthcare provider's license, registration, certification, or other permission to
engage in the provision of health care or veterinary medicine in this state.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect January 1, 2027, the public welfare requiring it.
- 6 - 010844